Utah statutes.
58-3a-501.   Unlawful conduct.
"Unlawful conduct" includes:
(1)  using the title "architect" or any other words, letters, or abbreviations
indicating that the person using them is an architect if the person has not
been licensed under this chapter, except as provided in Subsection
58-3a-304(1); or
(2)  engaging in or representing itself as engaging in the practice of
architecture as a corporation, proprietorship, partnership, or limited
liability company unless exempted from licensure under Section 58-1-307 or
58-3a-304.
